Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-321
State Board of Education; State Board of Vocational Education; assumption of powers and duties; Commissioner of Education; duties.

(1) The State Board of Education shall replace the State Board of Vocational Education and, when acting as the State Board of Vocational Education, shall assume the duties and powers provided in sections 79-738 to 79-744.

(2) The Commissioner of Education shall be the executive officer of the State Board of Vocational Education.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 10, p. 1059;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-330;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 149;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 10.